Louisiana, session 2026, HB941.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2780(B), (C), (G), (H), and (I) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 9:2780(J) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2780. Certain indemnification agreements invalid; additional insured coverage
* * *
B. Any provision contained in, collateral to, or affecting an agreement
pertaining to a well or wells for oil, gas, or water, or drilling for minerals which
occur in a solid, liquid, gaseous, or other state, is void and unenforceable to the
extent that it purports to or does provide for defense or indemnity, or either, to the
indemnitee against loss or liability for damages arising out of or resulting from death
or bodily injury to persons, which is caused by or results from the sole or concurrent
negligence or fault (strict liability) of the indemnitee, or an agent, employee, or an
independent contractor who is directly responsible to the indemnitee.
C. The term "agreement," as it pertains to a well or wells for oil, gas, or
water, or drilling for minerals which occur in a solid, liquid, gaseous, or other state,
as used in this Section, means any agreement or understanding, written or oral,
concerning any operations related to the exploration, development, production, or
transportation of oil, gas, or water, or drilling for minerals which occur in a solid,
liquid, gaseous, or other state, including but not limited to drilling, deepening,
reworking, repairing, improving, testing, treating, perforating, acidizing, logging,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 941 ENROLLED
conditioning, altering, plugging, or otherwise rendering services in or in connection
with any well or wells drilled for the purpose of producing or excavating,
constructing, improving, or otherwise rendering services in connection with any
mine shaft, drift, or other structure intended for use in the exploration for or
production of any mineral, or an agreement to perform any portion of any such work
or services or any act collateral thereto, including the furnishing or rental of
equipment, incidental transportation, and other goods and services furnished in
connection with any such service or operation.
* * *
G. Any provision in any agreement arising out of the operations, services,
or activities listed in Subsection C of this Section of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950 which requires waivers of subrogation, additional named insured
endorsements, or any other form of insurance protection which would frustrate or
circumvent the prohibitions of this Section, shall be null and void and of no force and
effect.
H. Notwithstanding the prohibitions of Subsection G of this Section,
additional insured coverage if procured as the result of an agreement shall be
enforceable solely as follows:
(1) A party can seek additional insured coverage for itself or itself and
members of its group as defined by its agreement with the named insured after the
party seeking additional insured coverage does all of the following:
(a) Makes such a request for an additional insured premium quote by
separate written communication to the named insured or the named insured's
insurance agent or broker, or both.
(b) Receives a premium quote from the named insured's insurer or its
authorized representative.
(c) Makes direct payment to the named insured's insurer or its authorized
representative for either additional insured coverage for itself only or for itself and
members of its group as defined by its agreement with the named insured.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 941 ENROLLED
(2)(a) Additional insured coverage for the group shall only be valid and
enforceable pursuant to this Subsection when the premium is expressly quoted for
group coverage, and the payment by the additional insured is for that corresponding
group premium amount.
(b) Once additional insured coverage is actually purchased, the named
insured, its insurer, or authorized representative shall notify the additional insured
in writing at least thirty days before the next annual premium is due or within seven
days of binding the renewal coverage for the named insured, whichever time period
is less.
(c) For any policy year where an additional insured either does not make the
request pursuant to Subparagraph (1)(a) of this Subsection or does not make payment
in the previous policy year pursuant to Subparagraph (1)(c) of this Subsection, the
named insured, its insurer, or authorized representative are not required to notify the
additional insured in writing at least thirty days before future renewals and, in such
instances, the additional insured shall make a new written request for additional
insured coverage pursuant to Subparagraph (1)(a) of this Subsection.
(3) When additional insured coverage is obtained pursuant to Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection, the additional insured or insureds, and not the named insured, are
liable for and responsible for any applicable deductibles or retentions as set forth in
the named insured's policy up to a maximum of one hundred thousand dollars, with
the named insured responsible to fund the amount of the applicable deductibles or
retentions, if any, in excess of one hundred thousand dollars.
(4) Any agreement where the named insured is made to fund all or any part
of the deductibles or retentions up to the first one hundred thousand dollars is null
and unenforceable and the provisions of this Subsection shall not apply.
(5) Nothing in this Subsection shall in any way be deemed to negate the
prohibition against defense and indemnity as set forth in Subsection B of this
Section, which defense and indemnity provisions remain null and void and against
public policy.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 941 ENROLLED
H. I. The provisions of this Act do not deprive a person who has transferred
land, with a reservation of mineral rights, of the right to secure an indemnity from
any lessee, operator, contractor, or other person conducting operations for the
exploration or production of minerals in connection with the reserved mineral rights;
provided such person does not retain a working interest or an overriding royalty
interest convertible to a working interest in any production obtained through
activities described in Subsection C of this Section.
I. J. This Act shall apply to certain provisions contained in, collateral to or
affecting agreements in connection with the illustrative activities listed in Subsection
C of this Section which are designed to provide indemnity to the indemnitee for all
work performed between the indemnitor and the indemnitee in the future. This
specifically includes what is commonly referred to in the oil industry as master or
general service agreements or blanket contracts in whatever form and by whatever
name. The provisions of this Act shall not apply to a contract providing indemnity
to the indemnitee when such contract was executed before the effective date of this
Act and which contract governs a specific terminable performance of a specific job
or activity listed in Subsection C of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.